Hawaii statutes.
§325-123 Confidentiality and content of
registry records. (a) All immunization records and reports made for the
purposes of this part that directly or indirectly identify a person shall be
kept confidential and shall not be disclosed by any person unless:

(1) The person identified, the person's legal
guardian, or in the case of a minor, the minor's parent or legal guardian
consents;

(2) Disclosure is deemed necessary by the director of
health to carry out this chapter;

(3) A court directs upon its determination that
disclosure is necessary for the conduct of proceedings before it;

(4) The disclosure is made between the person's
health care provider and payor to obtain reimbursement for services rendered to
the person; provided that disclosure shall be made only if the provider informs
the person that a reimbursement claim will be made to the person's payor, the
person is afforded an opportunity to pay the reimbursement directly, and the
person does not pay; or

(5) The department of health releases aggregate
immunization information that does not disclose any identifying information of
persons whose information is maintained in the registry.

(b) Registry information shall be limited to
patient name, demographic information, and contact information; information
specific to immunizations or medications received by the patient, including
types, manufacturers, lot numbers, expiration dates, anatomical sites of
administration, routes of administration, vaccine information statement
publication dates, doses, dates administered, the patient's history of vaccine-preventable
diseases, and contraindications, precautions, adverse reactions to, or comments
regarding immunizations or medications; and the name and contact information of
the vaccination administrator or medication provider and the patient's health care provider.

(c) The department of health shall adopt
administrative, physical, and technical measures to ensure the security of the
registry; protect the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of registry
data; and prevent unauthorized access to registry information. [L 2010, c 113,
pt of §1; am L 2012, c 275, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next